test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_NoExtra_abwaanaak_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     abwaanaak: abwaanaak
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1abwaanaak: niabwaanaak
     +Px2abwaanaak: giabwaanaak
     +Px3abwaanaak: oabwaanaak
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     abwaanaak+Dim: abwaanaakens
     abwaanaak+Con: abwaanaakenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     abwaanaak+Pos: abwaanaakim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     abwaanaak+Pej: abwaanaakish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     abwaanaak+Pos1Pl: abwaanaakinaan
     abwaanaak+PosPl: abwaanaakiwaa
     abwaanaak+PosObv: abwaanaakini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     abwaanaak+Pret: abwaanaakiban
     abwaanaak+VocPl: abwaanaak***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     abwaanaak+Obv: abwaanaakan
     abwaanaak+Pl: abwaanaakag
     abwaanaak+Loc: abwaanaaking
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim: niabwaanaakens
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con: niabwaanaakenh
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim: giabwaanaakens
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con: giabwaanaakenh
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim: oabwaanaakens
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con: oabwaanaakenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos: niabwaanaakim
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos: giabwaanaakim
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos: oabwaanaakim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej: niabwaanaakish
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej: giabwaanaakish
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej: oabwaanaakish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos1Pl: niabwaanaakinaan
     +Px1abwaanaak+PosPl: niabwaanaakiwaa
     +Px1abwaanaak+PosObv: niabwaanaakini
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos1Pl: giabwaanaakinaan
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosPl: giabwaanaakiwaa
     +Px2abwaanaak+PosObv: giabwaanaakini
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos1Pl: oabwaanaakinaan
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosPl: oabwaanaakiwaa
     +Px3abwaanaak+PosObv: oabwaanaakini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pret: niabwaanaakiban
     +Px1abwaanaak+VocPl: niabwaanaak***idig, idog***
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pret: giabwaanaakiban
     +Px2abwaanaak+VocPl: giabwaanaak***idig, idog***
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pret: oabwaanaakiban
     +Px3abwaanaak+VocPl: oabwaanaak***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1abwaanaak+Obv: niabwaanaakan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pl: niabwaanaakag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Loc: niabwaanaaking
     +Px2abwaanaak+Obv: giabwaanaakan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pl: giabwaanaakag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Loc: giabwaanaaking
     +Px3abwaanaak+Obv: oabwaanaakan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pl: oabwaanaakag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Loc: oabwaanaaking
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos: abwaanaakensim
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos: abwaanaakenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pej: abwaanaakensish
     abwaanaak+Con+Pej: abwaanaakenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl: abwaanaakensinaan
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl: abwaanaakensiwaa
     abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv: abwaanaakensini
     abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl: abwaanaakenhinaan
     abwaanaak+Con+PosPl: abwaanaakenhiwaa
     abwaanaak+Con+PosObv: abwaanaakenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pret: abwaanaakensiban
     abwaanaak+Dim+VocPl: abwaanaakens***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+Con+Pret: abwaanaakenhiban
     abwaanaak+Con+VocPl: abwaanaakenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     abwaanaak+Dim+Obv: abwaanaakensan
     abwaanaak+Dim+Pl: abwaanaakensag
     abwaanaak+Dim+Loc: abwaanaakensing
     abwaanaak+Con+Obv: abwaanaakenhan
     abwaanaak+Con+Pl: abwaanaakenhag
     abwaanaak+Con+Loc: abwaanaakenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pej: abwaanaakimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl: abwaanaakiminaan
     abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl: abwaanaakimiwaa
     abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv: abwaanaakimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pret: abwaanaakimiban
     abwaanaak+Pos+VocPl: abwaanaakim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     abwaanaak+Pos+Obv: abwaanaakiman
     abwaanaak+Pos+Pl: abwaanaakimag
     abwaanaak+Pos+Loc: abwaanaakiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl: abwaanaakishinaan
     abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl: abwaanaakishiwaa
     abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv: abwaanaakishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     abwaanaak+Pej+Pret: abwaanaakishiban
     abwaanaak+Pej+VocPl: abwaanaakish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     abwaanaak+Pej+Obv: abwaanaakishan
     abwaanaak+Pej+Pl: abwaanaakishag
     abwaanaak+Pej+Loc: abwaanaakishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pret: abwaanaakinaaniban
     abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl: abwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret: abwaanaakiwaaiban
     abwaanaak+PosPl+VocPl: abwaanaakiwaa***idig, idog***
     abwaanaak+PosObv+Pret: abwaanaakiniiban
     abwaanaak+PosObv+VocPl: abwaanaakini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Obv: abwaanaakinaanan
     abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pl: abwaanaakinaanag
     abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Loc: abwaanaakinaaning
     abwaanaak+PosPl+Obv: abwaanaakiwaaan
     abwaanaak+PosPl+Pl: abwaanaakiwaaag
     abwaanaak+PosPl+Loc: abwaanaakiwaaing
     abwaanaak+PosObv+Obv: abwaanaakinian
     abwaanaak+PosObv+Pl: abwaanaakiniag
     abwaanaak+PosObv+Loc: abwaanaakiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     abwaanaak+Pret+Obv: abwaanaakibanan
     abwaanaak+Pret+Pl: abwaanaakibanag
     abwaanaak+Pret+Loc: abwaanaakibaning
     abwaanaak+VocPl+Obv: abwaanaak***idig, idog***an
     abwaanaak+VocPl+Pl: abwaanaak***idig, idog***ag
     abwaanaak+VocPl+Loc: abwaanaak***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos: niabwaanaakensim
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos: niabwaanaakenhim
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos: giabwaanaakensim
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos: giabwaanaakenhim
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos: oabwaanaakensim
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos: oabwaanaakenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pej: niabwaanaakensish
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pej: niabwaanaakenhish
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pej: giabwaanaakensish
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pej: giabwaanaakenhish
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pej: oabwaanaakensish
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pej: oabwaanaakenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl: niabwaanaakensinaan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl: niabwaanaakensiwaa
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv: niabwaanaakensini
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl: niabwaanaakenhinaan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+PosPl: niabwaanaakenhiwaa
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+PosObv: niabwaanaakenhini
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl: giabwaanaakensinaan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl: giabwaanaakensiwaa
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv: giabwaanaakensini
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl: giabwaanaakenhinaan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+PosPl: giabwaanaakenhiwaa
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+PosObv: giabwaanaakenhini
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pos1Pl: oabwaanaakensinaan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+PosPl: oabwaanaakensiwaa
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+PosObv: oabwaanaakensini
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pos1Pl: oabwaanaakenhinaan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+PosPl: oabwaanaakenhiwaa
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+PosObv: oabwaanaakenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pret: niabwaanaakensiban
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+VocPl: niabwaanaakens***idig, idog***
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pret: niabwaanaakenhiban
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+VocPl: niabwaanaakenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pret: giabwaanaakensiban
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+VocPl: giabwaanaakens***idig, idog***
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pret: giabwaanaakenhiban
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+VocPl: giabwaanaakenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pret: oabwaanaakensiban
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+VocPl: oabwaanaakens***idig, idog***
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pret: oabwaanaakenhiban
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+VocPl: oabwaanaakenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Obv: niabwaanaakensan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Pl: niabwaanaakensag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Dim+Loc: niabwaanaakensing
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Obv: niabwaanaakenhan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Pl: niabwaanaakenhag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Con+Loc: niabwaanaakenhing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Obv: giabwaanaakensan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Pl: giabwaanaakensag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Dim+Loc: giabwaanaakensing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Obv: giabwaanaakenhan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Pl: giabwaanaakenhag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Con+Loc: giabwaanaakenhing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Obv: oabwaanaakensan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Pl: oabwaanaakensag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Dim+Loc: oabwaanaakensing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Obv: oabwaanaakenhan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Pl: oabwaanaakenhag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Con+Loc: oabwaanaakenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+Pej: niabwaanaakimish
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pej: giabwaanaakimish
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pej: oabwaanaakimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl: niabwaanaakiminaan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl: niabwaanaakimiwaa
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv: niabwaanaakimini
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl: giabwaanaakiminaan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl: giabwaanaakimiwaa
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv: giabwaanaakimini
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pos1Pl: oabwaanaakiminaan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosPl: oabwaanaakimiwaa
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+PosObv: oabwaanaakimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+Pret: niabwaanaakimiban
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+VocPl: niabwaanaakim***idig, idog***
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pret: giabwaanaakimiban
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+VocPl: giabwaanaakim***idig, idog***
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pret: oabwaanaakimiban
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+VocPl: oabwaanaakim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+Obv: niabwaanaakiman
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+Pl: niabwaanaakimag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos+Loc: niabwaanaakiming
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Obv: giabwaanaakiman
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Pl: giabwaanaakimag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pos+Loc: giabwaanaakiming
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Obv: oabwaanaakiman
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Pl: oabwaanaakimag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pos+Loc: oabwaanaakiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl: niabwaanaakishinaan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl: niabwaanaakishiwaa
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv: niabwaanaakishini
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl: giabwaanaakishinaan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl: giabwaanaakishiwaa
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv: giabwaanaakishini
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pos1Pl: oabwaanaakishinaan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosPl: oabwaanaakishiwaa
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+PosObv: oabwaanaakishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pret: niabwaanaakishiban
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+VocPl: niabwaanaakish***idig, idog***
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pret: giabwaanaakishiban
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+VocPl: giabwaanaakish***idig, idog***
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pret: oabwaanaakishiban
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+VocPl: oabwaanaakish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Obv: niabwaanaakishan
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Pl: niabwaanaakishag
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pej+Loc: niabwaanaakishing
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Obv: giabwaanaakishan
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Pl: giabwaanaakishag
     +Px2abwaanaak+Pej+Loc: giabwaanaakishing
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Obv: oabwaanaakishan
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Pl: oabwaanaakishag
     +Px3abwaanaak+Pej+Loc: oabwaanaakishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+Pret: niabwaanaakinaaniban
     +Px1abwaanaak+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niabwaanaakinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1abwaanaak+PosPl+Pret: niabwaanaakiwaaiban
